Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 3. Fire Prevention and Fire Control.

§ 45.2-818.
Firefighting equipment; fire prevention.

Each mine shall be provided with suitable firefighting equipment that is adequate for the size of the mine.

The following equipment, at a minimum, shall be immediately available at each mine:

A water car filled with water and provided with hose and pump, or waterlines and necessary hoses;

At least three 20-pound dry chemical fire extinguishers;

Ten 50-pound bags of rock dust, which shall be made available at doors or other strategic places;

Bolt cutters that can be used to cut trolley wire in an emergency;

One pair of rubber gloves that shall be used with each pair of bolt cutters when cutting trolley wire;

Two sledge hammers; and

Five hundred square feet of brattice cloth, nails, and a hammer.

Clean, dry sand, rock dust, or fire extinguishers that are suitable from a toxic and shock standpoint shall be placed at each electrical station, including each substation, transformer station, and permanent pump station, so as to be out of the smoke in case of a fire in the station.

Suitable fire extinguishers shall be provided at each (i) electrical station, including each substation, transformer station, and permanent pump station; (ii) piece of self-propelled mobile equipment; (iii) belt head and at the inby end of each belt; (iv) area used for the storage of flammable materials; (v) fueling station; and (vi) any other area that may constitute a fire hazard, so as to be on the fresh air side in case of a fire.

All firefighting equipment and each fire sensor system shall be maintained in a usable and operative condition. Each chemical extinguisher shall be examined every six months and the date of the examination shall be indicated on a tag attached to each extinguisher.

A sufficient number of approved one-hour, self-contained, self-rescuers shall be readily available, not more than 100 feet away, for the persons involved in the moving or transporting of any piece of off-track mining equipment.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-14.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.200; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2015, cc. 103, 397; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-819.
Duties in case of fire.

In case of a fire, the next inby permanent stopping into the return air course shall be opened as soon as possible in order to short circuit the air and permit close access to the fire for extinguishment.

When a fire that could endanger persons underground cannot be extinguished immediately, such persons shall be withdrawn promptly from the mine.

If a fire occurs, the person discovering it and any other person in the vicinity of the fire shall make a prompt effort to extinguish it.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-14.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.201; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-820.
Emergency response plans; list of next of kin.

Each operator shall develop an emergency response plan for each mine. The plan shall include (i) a mine emergency communication plan, (ii) an evacuation procedure, (iii) the identification of waterlines, (iv) the number system of brattice, (v) the location of each escapeway, and (vi) such other information as the Chief reasonably requires.

The emergency response plan shall be subject to approval by the Chief or mine inspector. The Chief may require periodic updates to an operator’s emergency response plan. Such operator shall comply with the requirements of the approved plan.

The emergency response plan shall be posted in a conspicuous manner and location readily accessible to all miners, both underground and at the surface of the mine.

The operator shall train miners in the implementation of the emergency response plan and shall conduct practice drills. Records of dates and times of practice drills shall be maintained in the emergency response plan.

Each miner employed by the operator who goes underground, and each visitor authorized by the operator to enter the mine, shall have available an adequate supply of self-rescue devices, each of which provides at least one hour of protection and is approved by MSHA. The training related to self-rescue devices shall be included in the emergency response plan approved by the Chief.

The operator shall maintain a list of the next of kin of all miners employed at the mine. The list shall be kept at the mine site or at a central facility readily accessible to the mine.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-14.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.202; 1996, c. 774; 2006, c. 291; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 291, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy shall assess wireless communication and miner locator systems to determine their effectiveness and availability. Upon conclusion of the assessment, the Department shall prepare a report of the findings and recommendations resulting from the assessment and provide copies of the assessment to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources. Following submission of the assessment to the committee chairmen, the Chief of the Division of Mines may require the use of such systems as part of the operator’s mine emergency response plan.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-821.
Reporting fires; response.

In case of any unplanned fire at a mine that is not extinguished within 30 minutes of discovery, the operator shall report the fire to the Chief by the quickest available means, giving all information known to the operator. The Chief, based on such information, shall promptly go in person or dispatch a mine inspector to the scene of the fire for consultation and assistance in the extinguishment of the fire and the protection of exposed persons. In the event of a difference of opinion as to measures required, the decision of the Chief or the mine inspector shall be final. The decision of the Chief regarding measures to extinguish the fire and protect persons shall have the force of an order issued pursuant to §

45.2-569

if it is delivered to the operator in writing.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-14.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.203; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-822.
Fire prevention in transportation of mining equipment.

Prior to moving or transporting any piece of off-track mining equipment in any area of the active workings where energized trolley wires or trolley feeder wires are present, (i) the piece of equipment shall be examined by a certified person to ensure that accumulations of coal dust, float coal dust, loose coal, oil, grease, and other combustible materials have been removed from such piece of equipment and (ii) a qualified person shall examine the trolley wires, trolley feeder wires, and the associated automatic circuit interrupting devices to ensure that proper short circuit protection exists.

A record shall be kept of the examinations required pursuant to subsection A and shall be made available, upon request, to the Chief or his authorized representative.

Off-track mining equipment shall not be moved or transported in any area of the active workings where energized trolley wires or trolley feeder wires are present unless under the direct supervision of a certified person who is physically present at all times during the moving or transporting of such equipment.

The frame of any unit of off-track mining equipment that is being moved or transported shall be covered on the top and on the trolley wire side with fire-resistant material.

Electrical contact shall be maintained between the mine track and the frame of any piece of off-track mining equipment that is being moved in a track and trolley entry. However, rubber-tired equipment need not be grounded to a transporting vehicle if no metal part of such rubber-tired equipment can come into contact with the transporting vehicle.

To avoid accidental contact with power lines, the equipment being transported or trammed shall be insulated or, if necessary, the assemblage shall be removed if the clearance to the power lines is six inches or less.

Sufficient prior notice shall be given to the Department so that a mine inspector, if he deems it necessary, can travel the route of the move before the actual move is made.

A minimum vertical clearance of one foot shall be maintained between the farthest projection of the piece of equipment that is being moved and the energized trolley wires or trolley feeder wires at all times during the movement or transportation of such equipment. If the height of the coal seam does not permit one foot of vertical clearance to be so maintained, the following additional precautions shall be taken:

Electric power shall be supplied to the trolley wires or trolley feeder wires only from outby the piece of equipment being moved or transported. Where direct current electric power is used and such electric power can be supplied only from inby the equipment being moved or transported, such power may be supplied from inby such equipment if a miner who has the means to cut off the power is in direct communication with the persons actually engaged in the moving or transporting operation and is stationed outby the equipment being moved;

The settings of automatic circuit interrupting devices used to provide short circuit protection for the trolley circuit shall be reduced to not more than one-half of the maximum current that could flow if the equipment being moved or transported were to come into contact with the trolley wire or trolley feeder wire;

At all times when the piece of equipment is being moved or transported, a miner shall be stationed at the first automatic circuit breaker outby the equipment being moved. Such miner shall be (i) in direct communication with the persons actually engaged in the moving or transporting operation and (ii) capable of communicating with the authorized person on the surface who is required to be on duty;

Where trolley phones are utilized to satisfy the requirements of subdivision 3, telephones or other equivalent two-way communication devices that can readily be connected with the mine communication system shall be carried by (i) the miner who is stationed at the first automatic circuit breaker outby the equipment being moved and (ii) by a miner who is actually engaged in the moving or transporting operation; and

No person shall be permitted to be inby the piece of equipment being moved or transported, or in the ventilating current of air that is passing over such equipment, except a person who is directly engaged in moving such equipment.

The provisions of subsection H shall not apply to a piece of mining equipment that is transported in a mine car if no part of the equipment extends above or over the sides of the mine car.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-14.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.204; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-823.
Storage and use of flammable fluids and materials.

Each underground storage place for oil, grease, or flammable hydraulic fluid shall be of fireproof construction.

Oil, grease, and flammable hydraulic fluid that is kept underground for current use shall be kept in a closed metal container.

Provisions shall be made to prevent an accumulation of spilled oil or grease at any such storage place or at any location at which such material is used.

Oily rags, oily waste, and wastepaper shall be kept in closed metal containers until it is removed for disposal.

No gasoline, benzene, kerosene, or other flammable oil shall be used underground in powering machinery.

Every oxygen or acetylene bottle that is used underground shall be secured while in use. When stored underground, each oxygen or acetylene bottle shall be placed in a safe location, protected from physical damage, stored with its cap in place where such storage is provided for on the tank, and secured upright or elevated, whichever mine heights allow.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-14.1, 45-43; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-89, 45.1-90, 45.1-100; 1974, c. 323; 1978, cc. 118, 729; 1981, c. 131; 1984, c. 590, § 45.1-89, c. 639; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.205; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-824.
Diesel-powered equipment.

Diesel-powered equipment may be utilized underground with the written approval of the Chief. The Chief shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. Such regulations shall require that the air in each travel way in which diesel equipment is used, and in any active workings connected thereto, be of a quality necessary for a safe, healthful working environment. The minimum quantity of ventilating air that shall be supplied for a permissible diesel machine in a given time shall conform to the quantity shown on the approval plate attached to the machine. Every diesel machine or piece of equipment shall be maintained in such manner that the exhaust emissions meet the standards to which the machine or equipment was manufactured.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-43; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-90; 1978, c. 729; 1981, c. 131; 1984, c. 639; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.206; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-825.
Arcs, sparks, and flames.

The intentional creation of any open arc, open spark, or open flame, except as provided in subsection B, is prohibited.

Any underground (i) welding or cutting with arc or flame or (ii) soldering, unless conducted in a fireproof enclosure that is ventilated with intake air, shall be done by or under the direct instruction of a certified foreman or repairman. A person certified in gas detection shall test for methane before and during such welding, cutting, or soldering operation in an underground coal mine and shall make a diligent search for fire after such an operation in all parts of the mine where such operation occurred. Rock dust or a suitable fire extinguisher shall be immediately available during such welding or cutting. Any welding operation shall be performed only in a well-ventilated area.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-72, 45-82.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-98; 1978, c. 729; 1993, cc. 389, 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.207; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”